Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.24.050

Declaration of candidacy—Certain offices, when filed.

Except where otherwise provided by this title, declarations of candidacy for the following offices shall be filed between 8:00 a.m. and 5:00 p.m. with the filing officer beginning the first Monday in May and ending the following Friday in the year in which the office is scheduled to be voted upon:

(1) Offices that are scheduled to be voted upon for full terms or both full terms and short terms at, or in conjunction with, a state general election; and

(2) Offices where a vacancy, other than a short term, exists that has not been filled by election and for which an election to fill the vacancy is required in conjunction with the next state general election.

This section supersedes all other statutes that provide for a different filing period for these offices.

[ 2023 c 394 s 1; 2011 c 349 s 7; 2006 c 344 s 6; 2003 c 111 s 605. Prior: 1990 c 59 s 81; 1986 c 167 s 8; 1984 c 142 s 2. Formerly RCW 29.15.020, 29.18.025.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 349: See note following RCW 29A.04.255.

Effective date—2006 c 344 ss 1-16 and 18-40: See note following RCW 29A.04.311.

Severability—1986 c 167: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.

Intent—1984 c 142: "It is the intention of the legislature that this act shall provide an equitable qualifying procedure for candidates who, at the time of filing, lack sufficient assets or income to pay the filing fees otherwise required of candidates for public office." [ 1984 c 142 s 1.]